da: Trådmateriale: Bomuld; Elastik (spandex-blanding); Hamp; Kevlar/aramid; Hør; Metallisk (metal-/polyblanding); Blandet/blanding; Monofilament (gennemsigtig nylon); Nylon; Polyester; Polypropylen (PP); Rayon/viskose; Silke; Uld; Andet
zh-TW: 線材材質: 棉; 彈性纖維 (彈性纖維混紡); 麻; 克維拉/芳綸; 亞麻; 金屬絲 (金屬/聚酯纖維混紡); 混合/混紡; 單絲線 (透明尼龍); 尼龍; 聚酯纖維; 聚丙烯 (PP); 人造絲/粘膠纖維; 絲; 羊毛; 其他
fr: Matière du fil: Coton; Élastique (mélange d’élasthanne); Chanvre; Kevlar / Aramide; Lin; Métallique (mélange métal/poly); Mixte/mélange; Monofilament (nylon transparent); Nylon; Polyester; Polypropylène (PP); Rayonne/Viscose; Soie; Laine; Autre
lt-LT: Siūlo medžiaga: Medvilnė; Elastanas (spandekso mišinys); Kanapė; Kevlaras / aramidas; Linas; Metalizuotas (metalo ir poliesterio mišinys); Mišinys / mišrus; Vienagijis valas (skaidrus nailonas); Nailonas; Poliesteris; Polipropilenas (PP); Dirbtinis šilkas / viskozė; Šilkas; Vilna; Kita
it: Materiale del filo: Cotone; Elastico (misto spandex); Canapa; Kevlar/Aramide; Lino; Metallizzato (misto metallo/poliestere); Misto; Monofilamento (nylon trasparente); Nylon; Poliestere; Polipropilene (PP); Rayon/Viscosa; Seta; Lana; Altro
fi: Langan materiaali: Puuvilla; Jousto (spandex-sekoite); Hamppu; Kevlar/aramidi; Pellava; Metallinen (metalli-polyesterisekoite); Sekoite; Monofilamentti (läpinäkyvä nailon); Nailon; Polyesteri; Polypropeeni (PP); Rayon/viskoosi; Silkki; Villa; Muu
hr-HR: Materijal konca: Pamuk; Elastika (mješavina sa spandeksom); Konoplja; Kevlar/aramid; Lan; Metalik (mješavina metala i poliestera); Mješavina; Monofilament (prozirni najlon); Najlon; Poliester; Polipropilen (PP); Rajon/viskoza; Svila; Vuna; Ostalo
hu: Szál anyaga: Pamut; Rugalmas (spandex keverék); Kender; Kevlár/aramid; Len; Fémes (fém/poliészter keverék); Keverék; Monofil (átlátszó nejlon); Nejlon; Poliészter; Polipropilén (PP); Műselyem/viszkóz; Selyem; Gyapjú; Egyéb
ja: スレッド素材: コットン; ゴム (スパンデックス混紡); ヘンプ; ケブラー/アラミド; リネン; メタリック (金属/ポリ混紡); 混紡/ブレンド; モノフィラメント (透明ナイロン); ナイロン; ポリエステル; ポリプロピレン (PP); レーヨン/ビスコース; シルク; ウール; その他
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำเส้นด้าย: ฝ้าย; ยางยืด (สแปนเด็กซ์ผสม); ป่าน; เคฟลาร์/อะรามิด; ลินิน; เมทัลลิก (โลหะ/โพลีผสม); ผสม; เส้นใยเดี่ยว (ไนลอนใส); ไนลอน; โพลีเอสเตอร์; โพลีโพรพิลีน (PP); เรยอน/วิสโคส; ไหม; ขนสัตว์; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Material do fio: Algodão; Elástico (mistura de spandex); Cânhamo; Kevlar/aramida; Linho; Metálico (mistura de metal/poli); Mistura/mescla; Monofilamento (nylon transparente); Nylon; Poliéster; Polipropileno (PP); Rayon/viscose; Seda; Lã; Outro
el: Υλικό νήματος: Βαμβάκι; Ελαστικό (μείγμα spandex); Κάνναβη; Kevlar/Αραμίδιο; Λινό; Μεταλλικό (μείγμα μετάλλου/πολυεστέρα); Μικτό/Μείγμα; Μονόινο (διάφανο νάιλον); Νάιλον; Πολυεστέρας; Πολυπροπυλένιο (PP); Ρεγιόν/Βισκόζη; Μετάξι; Μαλλί; Άλλο
pl: Materiał nici: Bawełna; Elastyczne (z domieszką spandeksu); Konopie; Kevlar/Aramid; Len; Metaliczne (mieszanka metalu/poliestru); Mieszanka; Monofilament (przezroczysty nylon); Nylon; Poliester; Polipropylen (PP); Rayon/wiskoza; Jedwab; Wełna; Inne
sl-SI: Material sukanca: Bombaž; Elastika (mešanica s spandeksom); Konoplja; Kevlar/Aramid; Lan; Kovina (mešanica kovine in poliestra); Mešanica; Monofilament (prozorni najlon); Najlon; Poliester; Polipropilen (PP); Umetna svila/viskoza; Svila; Volna; Drugo
sk-SK: Vláknitý materiál: Bavlna; Elastická (zmes spandexu); Konope; Kevlar/aramid; Ľan; Metalická (zmes kovu/polyesteru); Zmiešaná/zmes; Monofilament (priesvitný nylón); Nylón; Polyester; Polypropylén (PP); Umelý hodváb/viskóza; Hodváb; Vlna; Iné
cs: Materiál nitě: Bavlna; Elastan (směs se spandexem); Konopí; Kevlar/aramid; Len; Metalické (směs kovu a polyesteru); Směs; Monofil (čirý nylon); Nylon; Polyester; Polypropylen (PP); Umělé hedvábí / viskóza; Hedvábí; Vlna; Ostatní
sv: trådmaterial: Bomull; Elastisk (spandexblandning); Hampa; Kevlar/aramid; Linne; Metallisk (metall/poly-blandning); Blandning; Monofilament (genomskinlig nylon); Nylon; Polyester; Polypropen (PP); Rayon/viskos; Silke; Ull; Annat
pt-BR: Linha material: Algodão; Elástico (mistura de elastano); Cânhamo; Kevlar/aramida; Linho; Metálico (mistura de metal e poliéster); Misto/mistura; Monofilamento (nylon transparente); Nylon; Poliéster; Polipropileno (PP); Rayon/Viscose; Seda; Lã; Outros
de: Garnmaterial: Baumwolle; Elastisch (Elasthan-Mischung); Hanf; Kevlar/Aramid; Leinen; Metallic (Metall/Polyester-Mischung); Mischgarn; Monofilament (transparentes Nylon); Nylon; Polyester; Polypropylen (PP); Rayon/Viskose; Seide; Wolle; Sonstige
ro-RO: Material al aței: Bumbac; Elastic (amestec de spandex); Cânepă; Kevlar/Aramid; In; Metalizat (amestec metal/poliester); Mixt/Amestec; Monofilament (nailon transparent); Nailon; Poliester; Polipropilenă (PP); Raion/Vâscoză; Mătase; Lână; Altele
vi: Vật liệu sợi: Cotton; Đàn hồi (pha spandex); Cây gai dầu; Kevlar/Aramid; Lanh; Kim loại (pha kim loại/poly); Pha trộn; Sợi đơn (nylon trong suốt); Nylon; Polyester; Polypropylene (PP); Rayon/Viscose; Lụa; Len; Khác
zh-CN: 线材材质: 棉; 弹力（氨纶混纺）; 大麻纤维; 凯夫拉/芳纶; 亚麻; 金属（金属/聚酯混纺）; 混合/混纺; 单丝（透明尼龙）; 尼龙; 聚酯纤维; 聚丙烯 (PP); 人造丝/粘胶纤维; 丝绸; 羊毛; 其他
ru: Материал нити: Хлопок; Эластичная (смесь со спандексом); Конопля; Кевлар/арамид; Лен; Металлик (смесь металла и полиэстера); Смесовая; Мононить (прозрачный нейлон); Нейлон; Полиэстер; Полипропилен (ПП); Искусственный шелк/вискоза; Шелк; Шерсть; Другое
bg-BG: Материал на конеца: Памук; Еластичен (смес от еластан); Коноп; Кевлар/арамид; Лен; Металик (смес от метал и полиестер); Смесен; Монофиламент (прозрачен найлон); Найлон; Полиестер; Полипропилен (PP); Изкуствена коприна/вискоза; Коприна; Вълна; Друго
nb: Trådmateriale: Bomull; Elastisk (elastanblanding); Hamp; Kevlar/aramid; Lin; Metallisk (metall/poly-blanding); Blanding; Monofilament (gjennomsiktig nylon); Nylon; Polyester; Polypropylen (PP); Rayon/viskose; Silke; Ull; Annet
es: Material del hilo: Algodón; Elástico (mezcla de elastano); Cáñamo; Kevlar/aramida; Lino; Metálico (mezcla de metal/poliéster); Mixto/mezcla; Monofilamento (nylon transparente); Nylon; Poliéster; Polipropileno (PP); Rayón/viscosa; Seda; Lana; Otro
nl: Draad materiaal: Katoen; Elastisch (spandex-mix); Hennep; Kevlar/aramide; Linnen; Metallic (metaal-/polyestermix); Mix/Blend; Monofilament (transparant nylon); Nylon; Polyester; Polypropyleen (PP); Rayon/Viscose; Zijde; Wol; Overige
ko: 실 소재: 면; 신축성(스판덱스 혼방); 대마; 케블라/아라미드; 리넨; 메탈릭(금속/폴리에스터 혼방); 혼합/혼방; 모노필라멘트(투명 나일론); 나일론; 폴리에스터; 폴리프로필렌(PP); 레이온/비스코스; 실크; 울; 기타
tr: İplik malzemesi: Pamuk; Elastik (spandeks karışımı); Kenevir; Kevlar/Aramid; Keten; Metalik (metal/poli karışımı); Karışık/Karışım; Monofilament (şeffaf naylon); Naylon; Polyester; Polipropilen (PP); Suni ipek/Viskon; İpek; Yün; Diğer
en: Thread material: Cotton; Elastic (spandex blend); Hemp; Kevlar/Aramid; Linen; Metallic (metal/poly blend); Mixed/Blend; Monofilament (clear nylon); Nylon; Polyester; Polypropylene (PP); Rayon/Viscose; Silk; Wool; Other